apertium-eo-en.eo.dix.xml
<pardef n="Barcelono__np">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>n</l>                   <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="Andoj__np">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>n</l>                   <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="Marko__np">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>n</l>                   <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>

<!-- Se estas genraj indikoj, ni fajfas -->
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>n</l>                   <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>n</l>                   <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="James__np">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nomacc0"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Mark__np">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nomacc0"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Mary__np">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nomacc0"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Smith__np">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>oj</l>                  <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="Linux__np">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="a__np">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="np"/><s n="alpha"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="np"/><s n="alpha"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="np"/><s n="alpha"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="unu__num">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    
<pardef n="two__num">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l><b/>cent</l>            <r><b/>cent<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l><b/>mil</l>             <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l><b/>cent</l>            <r><b/>cent<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l><b/>mil</l>             <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l><b/>cent</l>            <r><b/>cent<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l><b/>mil</l>             <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
        
<pardef n="twenty__num">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r></r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e>                           <p><l><b/>unu</l>             <r><b/>unu</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e>                           <p><l><b/>du</l>              <r><b/>du</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e>                           <p><l><b/>tri</l>             <r><b/>tri</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e>                           <p><l><b/>kvar</l>            <r><b/>kvar</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e>                           <p><l><b/>kvin</l>            <r><b/>kvin</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e>                           <p><l><b/>ses</l>             <r><b/>ses</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e>                           <p><l><b/>sep</l>             <r><b/>sep</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e>                           <p><l><b/>ok</l>              <r><b/>ok</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e>                           <p><l><b/>naŭ</l>             <r><b/>naŭ</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
</pardef>
	</pardefs>

<e lm="unu">                  <i>unu</i><par n="unu__num"/></e>
<e lm="tri">                  <i>tri</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="kvin">                 <i>kvin</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="sep">                  <i>sep</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="naŭ">                  <i>naŭ</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="dek unu">              <i>dek<b/>unu</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="dek tri">              <i>dek<b/>tri</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="dek sep">              <i>dek<b/>sep</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="dudek">                <i>dudek</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="tridek">               <i>tridek</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="kvardek">              <i>kvardek</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="kvindek">              <i>kvindek</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="sesdek">               <i>sesdek</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="sepdek">               <i>sepdek</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="okdek">                <i>okdek</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="naŭdek">               <i>naŭdek</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="mil">                  <i>mil</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="Alpoj">                <i>Alpoj</i><par n="Andoj__np"/></e>
<e lm="Andoj">                <i>Andoj</i><par n="Andoj__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bulgario">             <i>Bulgario</i><par n="Barcelono__np"/></e>
<e lm="Filipinoj">            <i>Filipinoj</i><par n="Andoj__np"/></e>
<e lm="Italio">               <i>Italio</i><par n="Barcelono__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kanarioj">             <i>Kanarioj</i><par n="Andoj__np"/></e>
<e lm="Londono">              <i>Londono</i><par n="Barcelono__np"/></e>
<e lm="Romo">                 <i>Romo</i><par n="Barcelono__np"/></e>
<e lm="Vjetnamio">            <i>Vjetnamio</i><par n="Barcelono__np"/></e>
<e lm="Dario">                <i>Dario</i><par n="Marko__np"/></e>
<e lm="Eliza">                <i>Eliza</i><par n="Marko__np"/></e>
<e lm="Izabela">              <i>Izabela</i><par n="Marko__np"/></e>
<e lm="Klaŭdo">               <i>Kla</i><par n="ŭ"/><i>do</i><par n="Marko__np"/></e>
<e lm="Marta">                <i>Marta</i><par n="Marko__np"/></e>
<e lm="c">                    <i>c</i><par n="a__np"/></e>
<e lm="e">                    <i>e</i><par n="a__np"/></e>
<e lm="g">                    <i>g</i><par n="a__np"/></e>
<e lm="i">                    <i>i</i><par n="a__np"/></e>
<e lm="k">                    <i>k</i><par n="a__np"/></e>
<e lm="m">                    <i>m</i><par n="a__np"/></e>
<e lm="q">                    <i>q</i><par n="a__np"/></e>
<e lm="u">                    <i>u</i><par n="a__np"/></e>
<e lm="y">                    <i>y</i><par n="a__np"/></e>
<e lm="GCompris">             <i>GCompris</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
<e lm="SVN">                  <i>SVN</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
<e lm="Apertium">             <i>Apertium</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
<e lm="Vikipedio">            <i>Vikipedio</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
<e lm="Zapatista Armeo de Nacia Liberiĝo"><i>Zapatista<b/>Armeo<b/>de<b/>Nacia<b/>Liberi</i><par n="ĝ"/><i>o</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
<e lm="ABC News">             <i>ABC<b/>News</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
<e lm="Aarono">               <i>Aarono</i><par n="Marko__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ijobo">                <i>Ijobo</i><par n="Marko__np"/></e>
<e lm="King">                 <i>King</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Luksemburgo">          <i>Luksemburgo</i><par n="Barcelono__np"/></e>
<e lm="Paŭlo">                <i>Pa</i><par n="ŭ"/><i>lo</i><par n="Marko__np"/></e>
<e lm="Viktoria">             <i>Viktoria</i><par n="Marko__np"/></e>
<e>                           <i>Biwer</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e>                           <i>Kallas</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e>                           <i>Mutsch</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e>                           <i>Verheugen</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Apple">                <i>Apple</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
<e lm="Linukso">              <i>Linukso</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sovet-Unio">           <i>Sovet-Unio</i><par n="Barcelono__np"/></e>
<e lm="Nebrasko">             <i>Nebrasko</i><par n="Barcelono__np"/></e>
<e lm="Pireneoj">             <i>Pireneoj</i><par n="Andoj__np"/></e>
<e lm="Balkanoj">             <i>Balkanoj</i><par n="Andoj__np"/></e>
<e>                           <i>Biwer</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e>                           <i>Michel</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Amiel">                <i>Amiel</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ann-Marie">            <i>Ann-Marie</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Apertium">             <i>Apertium</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
<e lm="Biel">                 <i>Biel</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ceferina">             <i>Ceferina</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Cristobal">            <i>Cristobal</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Elfed">                <i>Elfed</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ellyn">                <i>Ellyn</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Fujimori">             <i>Fujimori</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Gamaliel">             <i>Gamaliel</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hemenegilda">          <i>Hemenegilda</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Irineo">               <i>Irineo</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Judith">               <i>Judith</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kayden">               <i>Kayden</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Lihuén">               <i>Lihuén</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Mathías">              <i>Mathías</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Myra">                 <i>Myra</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Priscilla">            <i>Priscilla</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sandy">                <i>Sandy</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Xixia">                <i>Xixia</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Carles">               <i>Carles</i><par n="James__np"/></e>
<e lm="Dennis">               <i>Dennis</i><par n="James__np"/></e>
<e lm="Lewis">                <i>Lewis</i><par n="James__np"/></e>
<e lm="Louis">                <i>Louis</i><par n="James__np"/></e>
<e lm="Thomas">               <i>Thomas</i><par n="James__np"/></e>
<e lm="Gyles">                <i>Gyles</i><par n="James__np"/></e>
<e lm="Morys">                <i>Morys</i><par n="James__np"/></e>
<e lm="Thames">               <i>Thames</i><par n="James__np"/></e>
<e lm="Stanislav Gross">      <i>Stanislav<b/>Gross</i><par n="James__np"/></e>
<e lm="Nov-Hampŝiro">         <i>Nov-Hamp</i><par n="ŝ"/><i>iro</i><par n="Barcelono__np"/></e>
<e lm="Mcdonald">             <i>Mcdonald</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
